Alaska, session 34, SB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 21.09.210(p) is amended to read: 04 (p) In this section, 05 (1) "blanket travel insurance" has the meaning given in 06 AS 21.42.825; 07 (2) "cancellation fee waiver" has the meaning given in 08 AS 21.42.825; 09 (3) "eligible group" has the meaning given in AS 21.42.825; 10 (4) "group travel insurance" means travel insurance that is issued 11 to an eligible group; 12 (5) "premium tax credit" means an amount that an insurer may use as 13 an offset against a premium tax payment; 14 (6) "primary certificate holder" means an individual who elects 15 and purchases travel insurance under a group travel insurance policy; 01 (7) "primary policyholder" means an individual who elects and 02 purchases travel insurance under an individual policy; 03 (8) "resident" has the meaning given in AS 21.27.990; 04 (9) "travel assistance services" has the meaning given in 05 AS 21.42.825; 06 (10) "travel insurance" has the meaning given in AS 21.42.825; 07 (11) "travel insurer" means an insurer who transacts travel 08 insurance. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 21.09.210 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 10 (q) The provisions of this section apply to travel insurers. Travel insurance 11 premiums will be taxed on insurance premiums paid by 12 (1) a primary policyholder who is a resident of the state; 13 (2) a primary certificate holder who is a resident of the state; or 14 (3) a blanket travel insurance policyholder who is a resident of the 15 state, whose principal place of business is in the state, or whose affiliate or subsidiary 16 having a principal place of business in the state has purchased the policy, subject to 17 any apportionment rules that apply to the insurer across multiple taxing jurisdictions 18 or that allow the insurer to allocate premiums on an apportioned basis in a reasonable 19 and equitable manner in those jurisdictions. 20 (r) A travel insurer shall 21 (1) document the state of residence or principal place of business of the 22 policyholder or certificate holder; and 23 (2) report as premiums the amount allocable to travel insurance and 24 not the amount received for travel assistance services or cancellation fee waivers. 25 * Sec. 3. AS 21.27.150(a) is amended to read: 26 (a) The director may issue a 27 (1) travel insurance limited producer license to a person in accordance 28 with AS 21.42.805 [WHO IS APPOINTED UNDER AS 21.27.100 AND WHO 29 SELLS TRAVEL INSURANCE; IN THIS PARAGRAPH, "TRAVEL INSURANCE" 30 HAS THE MEANING GIVEN IN AS 21.27.152]; 31 (2) title insurance limited producer license to a person whose place of 01 business is located in this state and whose sole purpose is to be appointed by and act 02 on behalf of a title insurer; 03 (3) bail bond limited producer license to a person who is appointed by 04 and acts on behalf of a surety insurer pertaining to bail bonds; 05 (4) motor vehicle rental agency limited producer license to a person 06 and, subject to the approval of the director, to employees of the person licensed that 07 the licensee authorizes to transact the business of insurance on the licensee's behalf if, 08 as to an employee, the licensee complies with (D) of this paragraph and if the licensee 09 (A) rents to others, without operators, 10 (i) private passenger motor vehicles, including 11 passenger vans, minivans, and sport utility vehicles; or 12 (ii) cargo motor vehicles, including cargo vans, pickup 13 trucks, and trucks with a gross vehicle weight of less than 26,000 14 pounds that do not require the operator to possess a commercial driver's 15 license; 16 (B) rents motor vehicles only to persons under rental 17 agreements that do not exceed a term of 90 days; 18 (C) transacts only the following kinds of insurance: 19 (i) motor vehicle liability insurance with respect to 20 liability arising out of the use of a vehicle rented from the licensee 21 during the term of the rental agreement; 22 (ii) uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, with 23 minimum limits described in AS 21.96.020(c) and (d) arising from the 24 use of a vehicle rented from the licensee during the term of the rental 25 agreement; 26 (iii) insurance against medical, hospital, surgical, and 27 disability benefits to an injured person and funeral and death benefits to 28 dependents, beneficiaries, or personal representatives of a deceased 29 person if the insurance is issued as incidental coverage with or 30 supplemental to liability insurance and arises out of the use of a vehicle 31 rented from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement; 01 (iv) personal effects insurance, including loss of use, 02 with respect to damage to or loss of personal property of a person 03 renting the vehicle and other vehicle occupants while that property is 04 being loaded into, transported by, or unloaded from a vehicle rented 05 from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement; 06 (v) towing and roadside assistance with respect to 07 vehicles rented from the licensee during the term of the rental 08 agreement; and 09 (vi) other insurance as may be authorized by regulation 10 by the director; 11 (D) notifies the director in writing, not later than 30 days after 12 employment, of the name, date of birth, social security number, location of 13 employment, and home address of an employee authorized by the licensee to 14 transact insurance on the licensee's behalf; and 15 (E) provides other information as required by the director; 16 (5) nonresident limited producer license to a person; a license that the 17 director issues under this paragraph grants the same scope of authority as a limited 18 lines producer license issued to the person by the person's home state; 19 (6) credit insurance limited producer license to a person who sells 20 limited lines credit insurance; 21 (7) miscellaneous limited producer license to a person who transacts 22 insurance in this state that restricts the person's authority to less than the total authority 23 for a line of authority described in AS 21.27.115(1) - (6); 24 (8) portable electronics limited producer license to a vendor that sells 25 or offers portable electronics insurance as defined in AS 21.36.515; the following 26 provisions apply to a license issued under this paragraph: 27 (A) a vendor shall file with the director a sworn application for 28 a license under this paragraph on a form prescribed and furnished by the 29 director; the vendor shall provide the name, residence address, location of the 30 vendor's home office, and other information required by the director for an 31 employee or officer that is designated by the vendor as the person responsible 01 for the vendor's compliance with the requirements of this chapter; however, if 02 the vendor derives more than 50 percent of its revenue from the sale of 03 portable electronics insurance, the vendor shall provide the information 04 required under this subparagraph for all officers, directors, and shareholders of 05 record having beneficial ownership of 10 percent or more of any class of 06 securities registered under the federal securities law; 07 (B) a portable electronics limited producer license issued under 08 this paragraph must authorize the employees or authorized representatives of a 09 vendor to transact portable electronics insurance at each location at which a 10 vendor offers portable electronics to customers in this state; and 11 (C) the employees or authorized representatives of the vendor 12 may transact portable electronics insurance and are not required to obtain a 13 limited producer license if 14 (i) the employees or authorized representatives are not 15 compensated based primarily on the number of customers enrolled for 16 coverage; however, an employee or authorized representative may 17 receive compensation for activities under the license that is incidental 18 to the employee's or authorized representative's overall compensation; 19 (ii) the insurer issuing the portable electronics insurance 20 provides a training program for employees and authorized 21 representatives of the portable electronics limited producer licensee that 22 includes instruction about the portable electronics insurance offered to 23 customers and the disclosures required under AS 21.36.515; and 24 (iii) the vendor maintains a register of each location in 25 the state where the vendor offers portable electronics insurance and 26 submits the register to the director not later than 30 days after the 27 director requests the register; 28 (9) crop insurance limited producer license to a person who sells or 29 offers crop insurance coverage for damage to crops from unfavorable weather 30 conditions, fire or lightning, flood, hail, insect infestation, disease, or other yield- 31 reducing conditions or perils provided by the private insurance market or that is 01 subsidized by the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation, including multi-peril crop 02 insurance. 03 * Sec. 4. AS 21.42 is amended by adding new sections to read: 04 Article 4. Travel Insurance. 05 Sec. 21.42.800. Travel insurance classification and filing. (a) Travel 06 insurance may be provided under an individual policy or under a group or blanket 07 policy. 08 (b) Eligible groups may purchase group and blanket policies. Eligible groups 09 include 10 (1) a tour operator, lodging provider, vacation property owner, hotel, 11 resort, travel club, travel agency, property manager, cultural exchange program, 12 airline, cruise line, railroad, steamship company, public bus carrier, or other common 13 carrier; the operator, owner, or lessor of a means of transportation of passengers; or 14 another entity engaged in the business of providing travel or travel services; for groups 15 listed in this paragraph, all members or customers of the group must have a common 16 exposure to risk associated with the travel; 17 (2) a college, school, or other institution of learning, covering students, 18 teachers, employees, or volunteers; 19 (3) an employer covering any group of employees, volunteers, 20 contractors, board of directors, dependents, or guests; 21 (4) a sports team, camp, or sponsor of a sports team or camp, covering 22 participants, members, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, or volunteers; 23 (5) a religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic 24 organization, or a branch of a religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic 25 organization, covering any group of members, participants, or volunteers; 26 (6) a financial institution or financial institution vendor, parent holding 27 company, trustee, agent, or designee of a financial institution or financial institution 28 vendor, account holder, credit card holder, debtor, guarantor, or purchaser; 29 (7) an incorporated or unincorporated association having a common 30 interest, constitution, and bylaws and organized and maintained in good faith for 31 purposes other than obtaining insurance for members or participants of the association 01 covering its members; 02 (8) a labor union; 03 (9) a trust or the trustees of a fund established, created, or maintained 04 for the benefit of and covering members, employees, or customers, subject to the 05 director's approval of the use of a trust and the state's premium tax provisions in 06 AS 21.09.210 for one or more associations that meet the requirements of (7) or (8) of 07 this subsection; 08 (10) an entertainment production company covering a group of 09 participants, volunteers, audience members, contestants, or workers; 10 (11) a volunteer fire department, ambulance, rescue, police 11 department, court, or any first aid, civil defense, or other volunteer group; 12 (12) a preschool, daycare institution for children or adults, or senior 13 citizen club; 14 (13) a common carrier, operator, owner or lessor of a means of 15 transportation, or automobile or truck rental or leasing company covering a group of 16 individuals who may become renters, lessees, or passengers defined by their travel 17 status on the rented or leased vehicle; the common carrier, operator, owner or lessor of 18 a means of transportation, or automobile or truck rental or leasing company is the 19 policyholder under a policy to which this subsection applies; and 20 (14) any other group the director determines is engaged in a common 21 enterprise or has an economic, educational, or social affinity or relationship, and for 22 which issuance of the policy would not be contrary to the public interest. 23 (c) Travel insurance is classified and filed for purposes of rates and forms 24 under the inland marine line of insurance. 25 (d) Eligibility and underwriting standards for travel insurance may be 26 developed and provided based on travel protection plans that are designed for 27 individual or identified marketing or distribution channels if those standards also meet 28 the underwriting standards for inland marine and transportation lines of insurance in 29 the state. 30 Sec. 21.42.805. Travel insurance limited producers and travel retailers. (a) 31 The director may issue a travel insurance limited producer license to an individual or 01 business entity that has filed with the director an application in a form and manner 02 prescribed by the director. A travel insurance limited producer shall be licensed to sell, 03 solicit, or negotiate travel insurance through a licensed insurer. A person may act as a 04 travel insurance limited producer only if the person is licensed under this subsection. 05 (b) A travel retailer may offer and disseminate travel insurance to its 06 customers on behalf of and under the direction of a travel insurance limited producer. 07 A person may act as a travel retailer only if the person is a business entity that is 08 included in the register maintained by the travel insurance limited producer under 09 (e)(1) of this section. 10 (c) A travel retailer's employee or authorized representative who is not a travel 11 insurance limited producer may not 12 (1) evaluate or interpret the material terms, benefits, and conditions of 13 the offered travel insurance coverage; 14 (2) evaluate or provide advice concerning a prospective purchaser's 15 existing insurance coverage; or 16 (3) represent that the employee or authorized representative is a 17 licensed insurer, licensed producer, or insurance expert. 18 (d) A travel insurance limited producer or travel retailer shall provide to a 19 purchaser of travel insurance 20 (1) a description of the material terms of the insurance coverage; 21 (2) a description of the claims process; 22 (3) a description of the review and return or cancellation process; and 23 (4) the identity and contact information for the insurer and the travel 24 insurance limited producer. 25 (e) A travel insurance limited producer shall 26 (1) maintain, in a format prescribed by the director, a register of each 27 travel retailer that offers travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of the 28 producer and make the register available to the director upon request; the register must 29 include 30 (A) the name, address, and contact information of each travel 31 retailer; 01 (B) the name, address, and contact information of each officer 02 or person who directs or controls the travel retailer's operations; and 03 (C) the federal employment identification number of the travel 04 retailer; 05 (2) certify that each travel retailer that offers travel insurance on behalf 06 of and under the direction of the producer complies with 18 U.S.C. 1033; 07 (3) require each employee and authorized representative of a travel 08 retailer that offers travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of the producer 09 whose duties include offering and disseminating travel insurance to receive a training 10 or instruction program that, at a minimum, contains adequate instruction on the type of 11 insurance offered, ethical sales practices, and the disclosures that must be provided to 12 its prospective customers; the training program is subject to review and approval by 13 the director; 14 (4) designate one of its employees as the person responsible for the 15 producer's compliance with applicable travel insurance laws and regulations; the 16 employee must be an individual who is licensed as an insurance producer; and 17 (5) pay all applicable licensing fees required under this title. 18 (f) A person designated under (e)(4) of this section and the president, 19 secretary, treasurer, and any other officer or person who directs or controls the travel 20 insurance limited producer's insurance operations shall comply with the fingerprinting 21 requirements applicable to insurance producers in the resident state of the travel 22 insurance limited producer. 23 (g) A travel insurance limited producer is liable for the acts of a travel retailer 24 transacting travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of the producer and 25 shall use reasonable means to ensure the travel retailer's compliance with applicable 26 travel insurance laws and regulations. 27 (h) A travel retailer offering or disseminating travel insurance shall make 28 available to a prospective purchaser brochures or other written materials that 29 (1) provide the identity and contact information of the insurer and the 30 travel insurance limited producer; 31 (2) explain that the purchase of travel insurance is not required in order 01 to purchase any other product or service from the travel retailer; and 02 (3) state that a person transacting travel insurance may provide general 03 information about the insurance offered, including a description of the coverage and 04 price, but is not qualified or authorized to answer questions about the terms and 05 conditions of the insurance offered or to evaluate the adequacy of the customer's 06 insurance coverage. 07 (i) A travel retailer whose insurance-related activities, and those of the travel 08 retailer's employees and authorized representatives, are limited to offering and 09 disseminating travel insurance under this section may receive related compensation 10 upon registration under (e)(1) of this section. 11 (j) The requirements of AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825 apply to travel insurance 12 that covers a resident of the state and that is sold, solicited, negotiated, or offered in 13 the state, and to policies and certificates that are delivered or issued for delivery in the 14 state. AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825 do not apply to cancellation fee waivers or travel 15 assistance services except as expressly provided in AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825. All 16 other applicable provisions of the insurance laws of the state continue to apply to 17 travel insurance except that the specific provisions of AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825 18 supersede any general provisions of law that would otherwise be applicable to travel 19 insurance. 20 (k) Any person licensed as an insurance producer for a line of authority 21 described in AS 21.27.115(1) - (6) may sell, solicit, and negotiate travel insurance. A 22 property and casualty insurance producer is not required to be appointed by an insurer 23 in order to sell, solicit, or negotiate travel insurance. 24 Sec. 21.42.810. Travel protection plans. (a) A travel protection plan may be 25 offered in the state for one price if 26 (1) the travel protection plan clearly discloses to the consumer, at or 27 before the time of purchase, that the plan includes travel insurance, travel assistance 28 services, and cancellation fee waivers, as applicable, and provides information and an 29 opportunity, at or before the time of purchase, for the consumer to obtain additional 30 information regarding the features and pricing of each feature; and 31 (2) the fulfillment materials 01 (A) describe and delineate the travel insurance, travel 02 assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers in the travel protection plan; 03 and 04 (B) include the travel insurance disclosures and the contact 05 information for persons providing travel assistance services and cancellation 06 fee waivers, as applicable. 07 (b) Travel assistance services provided under a travel protection plan may 08 include security advisories, destination information, vaccination and immunization 09 information services, travel reservation services, entertainment, activity and event 10 planning, translation assistance, emergency messaging, international legal and medical 11 referrals, medical case monitoring, coordination of transportation arrangements, 12 emergency cash transfer assistance, medical prescription replacement assistance, 13 passport and travel document replacement assistance, lost luggage assistance, 14 concierge services, and any other service that is furnished in connection with planned 15 travel. Travel assistance services are not insurance and not related to insurance. 16 Sec. 21.42.815. Sales practices. (a) A person offering travel insurance to 17 residents of the state is subject to the unfair trade practices and fraud provisions under 18 AS 21.36, except as otherwise provided in AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825. If a conflict 19 occurs between AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825 and another provision of this title relating to 20 the sale and marketing of travel insurance and travel protection plans, AS 21.42.800 - 21 21.42.825 control. 22 (b) Offering or selling a travel insurance policy that could never result in 23 payment of a claim for a person insured under the policy is an unfair trade practice 24 under AS 21.36. 25 (c) All documents provided to consumers before the purchase of travel 26 insurance, including sales, advertising, and marketing materials, must be consistent 27 with the travel insurance policy itself, including forms, endorsements, policies, rate 28 filings, and certificates of insurance. 29 (d) If a travel insurance policy or certificate contains preexisting condition 30 exclusions, the person offering the policy shall provide to the consumer, before the 31 time of purchase and in the fulfillment materials for the coverage, information and an 01 opportunity to learn more about the preexisting condition exclusions. 02 (e) A person offering a travel insurance policy shall provide to the 03 policyholder or certificate holder fulfillment materials and the information described 04 in AS 21.42.805(d) as soon as practicable following the purchase of a travel protection 05 plan. Unless the insured has either started a covered trip or filed a claim under the 06 travel insurance coverage, a policyholder or certificate holder may cancel a policy or 07 certificate for a full refund of the travel protection plan price from the date of purchase 08 of the travel protection plan until at least 09 (1) 15 days after the date of delivery of the fulfillment materials for the 10 travel protection plan if the materials were delivered by mail; the fulfillment materials 11 are considered delivered under this paragraph when sent to the policyholder or 12 certificate holder; or 13 (2) 10 days after the date of delivery of the fulfillment materials for the 14 travel protection plan if the materials were delivered 15 (A) in person; the fulfillment materials are considered delivered 16 under this subparagraph when physically handed to the policyholder or 17 certificate holder; or 18 (B) electronically; the fulfillment materials are considered 19 delivered under this subparagraph when sent to the policyholder or certificate 20 holder. 21 (f) The policy documentation and fulfillment materials must disclose whether 22 the travel insurance is primary or secondary to other applicable coverage. 23 (g) If travel insurance is marketed directly to a consumer either by an insurer's 24 Internet website or by an aggregator website, it is not an unfair trade practice or other 25 violation of law if an accurate summary or short description of the coverage is 26 provided on the website and the consumer has access to the full provisions of the 27 policy through electronic means. In this subsection, "aggregator website" means a 28 website that provides access to information relating to insurance products from more 29 than one insurer, including product and insurer information, for use in comparison 30 shopping. 31 (h) A person may not offer, solicit, or negotiate travel insurance or travel 01 protection plans on an individual or group basis by using a negative or opt-out option 02 that requires a consumer to take an affirmative action to deselect coverage, including 03 unchecking a box on an electronic form, when the consumer purchases a trip. 04 (i) It is an unfair trade practice subject to penalty under AS 21.36 to market 05 blanket travel insurance coverage as free. 06 (j) If a consumer's destination jurisdiction requires insurance coverage, it is 07 not an unfair trade practice under AS 21.36 to require that a consumer choose between 08 the following options as a condition of purchasing a trip or travel package: 09 (1) purchasing the coverage required by the destination jurisdiction 10 through the travel retailer or travel insurance limited producer supplying the trip or 11 travel package; or 12 (2) agreeing to obtain and provide before departure proof of coverage 13 that meets the requirements of the destination jurisdiction. 14 Sec. 21.42.820. Travel administrators. (a) Notwithstanding any other 15 provision of this title, a person may not act or represent itself as a travel administrator 16 for travel insurance in the state unless the person 17 (1) is a licensed property and casualty insurance producer in the state 18 for activities permitted under that producer license; 19 (2) holds a valid managing general agent license in the state; or 20 (3) holds a valid third-party administrator license in the state. 21 (b) A travel administrator and the employees of the travel administrator are 22 exempt from the licensing requirements applicable to adjusters under this title for the 23 purposes of administering travel insurance. 24 (c) An insurer is liable for the acts of a travel administrator administering 25 travel insurance underwritten by the insurer and shall ensure that the travel 26 administrator maintains all books and records relevant to the insurer. The travel 27 administrator shall make the books and records available to the director upon request. 28 Sec. 21.42.825. Definitions. In AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825, 29 (1) "blanket travel insurance" means a policy of travel insurance that is 30 issued to any eligible group and that provides coverage for specific classes of persons 31 defined in the policy with coverage provided to all members of the eligible group 01 without a separate charge to individual members of the eligible group; 02 (2) "cancellation fee waiver" 03 (A) means a contractual agreement between a supplier of travel 04 services and its customer to waive some or all of the nonrefundable 05 cancellation fee provisions of the supplier's underlying travel contract with or 06 without regard to the reason for the cancellation or form of reimbursement; and 07 (B) does not mean insurance; 08 (3) "eligible group" means two or more persons who are engaged in a 09 common enterprise or have an economic, educational, or social affinity or relationship; 10 (4) "fulfillment materials" means documentation that is sent to the 11 purchaser of a travel protection plan and that confirms the purchase and provides 12 coverage and assistance details of the travel protection plan; 13 (5) "offering and disseminating" means providing general information, 14 including a description of the coverage and price, as well as processing the application 15 and collecting premiums; 16 (6) "travel administrator" means a person who, directly or indirectly, 17 underwrites, collects charges, collateral, or premiums from residents of this state, or 18 adjusts or settles claims in connection with travel insurance; a person may not be 19 considered a travel administrator if the person's only actions that would otherwise 20 cause the person to be considered a travel administrator are among the following: 21 (A) a person working for a travel administrator to the extent 22 that the person's activities are subject to the supervision and control of the 23 travel administrator; 24 (B) an insurance producer selling insurance or engaged in 25 administrative and claims-related activities within the scope of the producer's 26 license; 27 (C) a travel retailer offering and disseminating travel insurance 28 that is registered under the license of a limited lines travel insurance producer 29 in accordance with AS 21.42.800 - 21.42.825; 30 (D) a person adjusting or settling claims in the normal course 31 of that person's practice or employment as an attorney who does not collect 01 charges or premiums in connection with insurance coverage; or 02 (E) a business entity that is affiliated with a licensed insurer 03 while acting as a travel administrator for the direct and assumed insurance 04 business of the affiliated insurer; 05 (7) "travel assistance services" means noninsurance services for which 06 the consumer is not indemnified based on a fortuitous event and for which provision 07 of the service does not result in transfer or shifting of risk that would constitute the 08 business of insurance; 09 (8) "travel insurance" 10 (A) means insurance coverage for personal risks incident to 11 planned travel, including 12 (i) trip or event interruption or cancellation; 13 (ii) lost baggage or personal effects; 14 (iii) damage to accommodations or a rental vehicle; 15 (iv) sickness, an accident, disability, or death occurring 16 during travel; 17 (v) emergency evacuation; 18 (vi) repatriation of remains; or 19 (vii) any other contractual obligation to indemnify or 20 pay a specified amount to a traveler upon determinable contingencies 21 related to travel as approved by the director; 22 (B) does not include 23 (i) comprehensive medical insurance that provides 24 coverage during a trip lasting longer than six months, including a trip 25 during which a traveler is working or residing overseas as an expatriate; 26 or 27 (ii) any other product that requires a specific insurance 28 producer license; 29 (9) "travel insurance limited producer" means a 30 (A) licensed managing general agent or third-party 31 administrator; 01 (B) licensed insurance producer; or 02 (C) travel administrator; 03 (10) "travel protection plan" means a plan that provides combined 04 features that may include one or more of the following: travel insurance, travel 05 assistance services, or cancellation fee waivers; 06 (11) "travel retailer" means a business entity that makes, arranges, or 07 offers planned travel. 08 * Sec. 5. AS 21.27.152 is repealed. 09 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 10 read: 11 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to an insurance policy or contract issued, 12 delivered, or renewed on or after the effective date of secs. 1 - 5 of this Act. 13 * Sec. 7. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.